Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.020

Definitions.

Unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, the definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Board" means the Washington state board of nursing.

(2) "Department" means the department of health.

(3) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

(4) "Diagnosis," in the context of nursing practice, means the identification of, and discrimination between, the person's physical and psychosocial signs and symptoms that are essential to effective execution and management of the nursing care regimen.

(5) "Diploma" means written official verification of completion of an approved nursing education program.

(6) "Nurse" or "nursing," unless otherwise specified as a practical nurse or practical nursing, means a registered nurse or registered nursing.

[ 2023 c 123 s 17; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 402.]

NOTES:

Short title—2023 c 123: See RCW 18.80.900.